src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_SGNOM_0

+Sg+Nom:0 # ;


LEXICON NUM_CASES_SG_BACK

0 NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0 NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT

0 NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0 NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT

+Sg+Ess:nä # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;

LEXICON NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK

+Sg+Ess:na # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;

LEXICON NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK

+Sg+Ade:lla # ;
+Sg+Ine:šša # ;
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT

+Sg+Ade:llä # ;
+Sg+Ine:ššä # ;
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON NUM_CASES_PL_BACK

+Pl+Ade:illa # ;
+Pl+Ine:išša # ;
+Pl+Ess:ina # ;


LEXICON NUM_CASES_PL_FRONT

+Pl+Ade:illä # ;
+Pl+Ine:iššä # ;
+Pl+Ess:inä # ;

LEXICON NUM_SGPAR_TA

+Sg+Par:tA # ;

LEXICON NUM_SGPAR_TÄ

+Sg+Par:tä # ;

LEXICON NUM_PLGEN_IEN

+Pl+Gen:ien  # ;

LEXICON NUM_PLPAR_IE

+Pl+Par:ie  # ;
